North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-07 Absent Voters’ Ballots and Absentee Voting
16.1-07-23.
Transmission of unvoted ballots.

For all covered elections for which this state has not received a waiver under the Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act [42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1(g)(2)] not later than forty-five days before the election or, if the forty-fifth day before the election is a weekend or holiday, not later than the business day preceding the forty-fifth day, the appropriate election official shall transmit ballots and balloting materials to all covered voters who by that date submit a valid military-overseas ballot application.

A covered voter who requests a ballot and balloting materials be sent to the voter by electronic transmission may choose facsimile transmission, electronic mail, or other electronic delivery approved by the secretary of state. The election official charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit the ballot and balloting materials to the voter using the means of transmission chosen by the voter.

If a ballot application from a covered voter arrives after the election official begins transmitting ballots and balloting materials to voters, the official shall transmit them to the voter not later than two business days after the application arrives.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 8.

16.1-07-24.
Timely casting of ballot.

To be valid, a military-overseas ballot must be submitted for mailing or other authorized means of delivery not later than 11:59 p.m. on the day before the election at the place where the voter completes the ballot. A military-overseas ballot must be received by the appropriate election official before the canvassing board meeting.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 9.

16.1-07-25.
Federal write-in absentee ballot.

A covered voter may use the federal write-in absentee ballot, in accordance with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act [42 U.S.C. 1973ff-2], to vote for all offices and ballot measures in a covered election.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 10.

16.1-07-26.
Receipt of voted ballot.

A valid military-overseas ballot cast in accordance with section 16.1-07-24 must be counted if it is delivered before the canvassing board meets to canvas the returns.

If, at the time of completing a military-overseas ballot and balloting materials, the voter has affirmed under penalty of perjury under section 16.1-07-27 that the ballot was timely submitted, the ballot may not be rejected on the basis that it has a late postmark, an unreadable postmark, or no postmark.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 11.

16.1-07-27.
Declaration.

Each military-overseas ballot must include or be accompanied by a declaration signed by the voter declaring that a material misstatement of fact in completing the document may be grounds for a conviction of perjury under the laws of the United States or this state.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 12.

16.1-07-28.
Confirmation of receipt of application and voted ballot.

The secretary of state, in coordination with local election officials, shall implement an electronic free-access system by which a covered voter may determine by telephone, electronic mail, or internet access whether:

The voter’s military-overseas ballot application has been received and accepted; and

The voter’s military-overseas ballot has been received and the current status of the ballot.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 13.

16.1-07-29.
Use of voter’s electronic mail address.

A covered voter who provides an electronic mail address to a local election official may request that the voter’s application for a military-overseas ballot be considered a standing request for electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections held through December thirty-first of the year following the calendar year of the date of the application or another shorter period the voter specifies. An election official shall provide a military-overseas ballot to a voter who makes a request for each election to which the request is applicable. A covered voter entitled to receive a military-overseas ballot for a primary election under this subsection also is entitled to receive a military-overseas ballot for the general election.

An electronic mail address provided by a covered voter is a confidential record. An election official may use the address only to communicate with the voter about the voting process, including transmitting military-overseas ballots and election materials if the voter has requested electronic transmission, and verifying the voter’s mailing address and physical location, as needed.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 14.

16.1-07-30.
Publication of election notice.

Not later than one hundred days before a regularly scheduled election to which sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33 apply, and as soon as practicable in the case of a special election, the secretary of state and each local election official charged with printing and distributing ballots and balloting materials for that election shall prepare an election notice, to be used in conjunction with the federal write-in absentee ballot described in section 16.1-07-25. The election notice must contain a list of all of the ballot measures and federal, state, and local offices that as of that date the secretary of state and the local election official expect to be on the ballot on the date of the election. The notice also must contain specific instructions for how a voter is to indicate on the federal write-in absentee ballot the voter’s choice for each office to be filled and for each ballot measure to be contested. Upon publication of the election notice, the secretary of state shall provide the local election officials of the state with the location of the notice on the secretary of state’s website.

A covered voter may request a copy of an election notice. The officials charged with preparing the election notice shall send the notice to the voter by facsimile, electronic mail, or regular mail, as the voter requests if the voter is not able to obtain that same notice from the secretary of state’s website.

At least fifty-five days before an election, the officials charged with preparing the election notice shall update the notice with the certified candidates for each office and ballot measure questions and make the updated notice publicly available.

A local election official who maintains an internet website shall make updated versions of its election notices regularly available on the website.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 15; 2015, ch. 158, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 158, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

16.1-07-31.
Prohibition of nonessential requirements.

If a voter’s mistake or omission in the completion of a document under sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33 does not prevent determining whether a covered voter is eligible to vote, the mistake or omission does not invalidate the document. Failure to satisfy a nonessential requirement, such as using paper or envelopes of a specified size or weight, does not invalidate a document submitted under this chapter. In any write-in ballot authorized by law, if the intention of the voter is discernable, as provided under the Help America Vote Act [42 U.S.C. 15481(a)(6)], an abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of a candidate or a political party must be accepted as a valid vote.

Notarization is not required for the execution of a document under sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33. An authentication, other than the declaration specified in section 16.1-07-27 or the declaration on the federal postcard application and federal write-in absentee ballot, is not required for execution of a document under sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33. The declaration and any information in the declaration may be compared against information on file to ascertain the validity of the document.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 16.

16.1-07-32.
Issuance of injunction or other equitable relief.

A court may issue an injunction or grant other equitable relief appropriate to ensure substantial compliance with, or enforce, sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33 on application by:

A covered voter alleging a grievance under sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33; or

An election official in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 17.

16.1-07-33.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Sections 16.1-07-18 through 16.1-07-33 modify, limit, and supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act [15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq.] but do not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act [15 U.S.C. 7001(c)] or authorized electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act [15 U.S.C. 7003(b)].

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 154, § 18.

16.1-07-34.
Emergency procedures to facilitate absentee voting.

If an international, national, state, or local disaster or emergency or other situation arises which makes substantial compliance with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act [42 U.S.C. 1973ff et seq.] impossible or impracticable, as confirmed by the existence of armed conflict involving the armed forces of the United States or the mobilization of those forces, including national guard and reserve component members of this state, by the occurrence of a natural disaster or the existence of a state of emergency, civil unrest, war, or other exigency in a foreign country, or by an official declaration by the governor that a state of disaster or emergency exists, the secretary of state may prescribe special procedures or requirements as may be necessary to facilitate absentee voting by those absent uniformed services voters or overseas voters directly affected and who are eligible to vote in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 170, § 1.